District of Columbia statutes.
38-2572.01

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Special Education Due Process Hearing Independence and Transparency Act of 2014”.

Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-194, § 201, 61 DCR 12411

History